main/kickapoo_lexicon.lexc
! Testing prefixes

Multichar_Symbols
%<n%>    ! Noun

%<sg%>   ! Singular
%<pl%>   ! Plural
%<prox%> ! Proximate
%<obv%>  ! Obviative
%<voc%>  ! Vocative
%<loc%>  ! Locative
%<attr%> ! Attributive
%<prep%> ! Prepositional

%<poss%> ! Possessive
%<1%>    ! 1st Person
%<2%>    ! 2nd Person
%<3%>    ! 3rd Person
%<incl%> ! Inclusive
%<excl%> ! Exclusive

%{n%}
%{k%}    ! The possessive prefixes
%{o%}

%{a%}
%{e%} ! singular vocative
%{w%}      ! dropped after [o]

%{tc%} ! t/c alternation
%{sθ%} ! s/θ alternation

aa
ee ! long vowels
ii
oo

th ! = theta

@U.POSS.1SG@
@U.POSS.2SG@
@U.POSS.3SG@
@U.POSS.1IN@ ! Which possessive affix is required?
@U.POSS.1EX@
@U.POSS.2PL@
@U.POSS.3PL@

@D.POSS@ ! If no possessive prefix, then no suffix


@U.IPOSS.T@
@U.IPOSS.F@ ! Marked for possession?

@R.PREQ.F@
@R.PREQ.T@
@P.PREQ.F@ ! require/set is poss prefix required?
@P.PREQ.T@
@U.PREQ.T@
@U.PREQ.F@ ! Is poss prefix required?

@U.ANIM.T@
@U.ANIM.F@ ! Is animate?

@U.EM.T@ ! takes 'me' with possession?
@D.EM@

LEXICON Root
@U.IPOSS.T@@P.PREQ.T@ N-poss-pre ; ! Nouns with a possessive affix
@U.IPOSS.T@@P.PREQ.F@ N-poss-pre ;
@U.IPOSS.F@@P.PREQ.F@ N ;
LEXICON N-poss-pre
 @U.POSS.1SG@:@U.POSS.1SG@%{n%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.2SG@:@U.POSS.2SG@%{k%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.3SG@:@U.POSS.3SG@%{o%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.1IN@:@U.POSS.1IN@%{k%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.1EX@:@U.POSS.1EX@%{n%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.2PL@:@U.POSS.2PL@%{k%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.3PL@:@U.POSS.3PL@%{o%}^ N ;


LEXICON N
 @R.PREQ.F@ N-preq-f ;
 @R.PREQ.T@ N-preq-t ;

LEXICON N-preq-f
 ineni       N-anim ; ! man
 niicaap     N-anim ; ! doll
 asamaakaah  N-anim ; ! soldier
 methoon     N-inan ; ! boat
 @U.EM.T@koohkoos    N-anim ; ! pig
 eenikw      N-anim ; ! ant
 moopi       N-anim ; ! automobile
 ahkohkw     N-anim ; ! bucket
 miin        N-anim ; ! berry
 sekwaahkw   N-anim ; ! cedar tree
 anaakw      N-anim ; ! star
 atheny      N-inan ; ! stone
 ooteen      N-inan ; ! town
 saethien    N-inan ; ! hunger
 maateth     N-inan ; ! knife
 oteemin     N-inan ; ! strawberry
 mehtekw     N-inan ; ! tree, stick
 kiisekw     N-inan ; ! sky
 paas        N-anim ; ! bus
 mehtotheeni N-anim ; ! Native American
 kiisethw    N-anim ; ! sun, moon, month
 saapwahkiih N-inan ; ! street
 @U.EM.T@sooniaah N-inan ; ! money

LEXICON N-preq-t
 -ky        N-anim ; ! mother
 -nehk      N-inan ; ! hand
 -hci       N-anim ; ! arm
 -iihkaan   N-anim ; ! friend
 -ooth      N-anim ; ! father

LEXICON N-anim
 @U.ANIM.T@ N-iposs ;

LEXICON N-inan
 @U.ANIM.F@ N-iposs ;

LEXICON N-iposs
 @U.EM.T@@U.IPOSS.T@%<poss%>:@U.IPOSS.T@em N-poss-post ;
 @D.EM@@U.IPOSS.T@%<poss%>:@D.EM@@U.IPOSS.T@ N-poss-post ;
 @U.IPOSS.F@ N-suff ;

LEXICON N-poss-post
 @U.POSS.1SG@%<1%>%<sg%>:@U.POSS.1SG@         N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.2SG@%<2%>%<sg%>:@U.POSS.2SG@         N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.3SG@%<3%>%<sg%>:@U.POSS.3SG@         N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.1IN@%<1%>%<incl%>:@U.POSS.1IN@^enaan N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.1EX@%<1%>%<excl%>:@U.POSS.1EX@^enaan N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.2PL@%<2%>%<pl%>:@U.POSS.2PL@^wa      N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.3PL@%<3%>%<pl%>:@U.POSS.3PL@^wa      N-suff ;

LEXICON N-suff
 @U.ANIM.T@ N-suff-anim   ;
 @U.ANIM.F@ N-suff-inan ;
 %<loc%>:^eki  # ;
 %<attr%>:^eki # ; ! TODO redirect correctly instead of ending word
 %<prep%>:^e   # ;

LEXICON N-suff-anim
 %<sg%>%<prox%>:^a    # ;
 %<sg%>%<obv%>:^ani   # ;
 %<sg%>%<voc%>:^%{e%} # ;
 %<pl%>%<prox%>:^aki  # ;
 %<pl%>%<obv%>:^ahi   # ;
 %<pl%>%<voc%>:^etike # ;

LEXICON N-suff-inan
 %<sg%>:^i   # ;
 %<pl%>:^ani # ;
